Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2346.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 34-255, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE34-255. Convicted persons; contracting employment; prohibition A. For a period of up to three years from the date of conviction for a violation of section 34-252 as determined by the court, the person convicted is not eligible to enter into a contract with any governmental agency, either directly as a contractor or supplier or indirectly as a subcontractor. B. If a person is convicted of violating section 34-252, the court may, for a period of up to three years from the date of conviction, may prescribe that the person not be employed by a corporation as an officer, director, employee or agent if the corporaton corporation engages in public work contracts with a governmental agency, either directly as a contractor or supplier or indirectly as a subcontractor. END_STATUTE